Arkansas, session 2025, HB1427.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Healthy Moms, Healthy
Babies Act".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-77-151 is repealed to be reenacted and
transferred to another subchapter of the Arkansas Code.
20-77-151. Depression screening for pregnant women.
(a) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall reimburse for depression
screening of a pregnant woman.
(b) The Department of Human Services shall apply for any federal
waiver, Medicaid state plan amendments, or other authority necessary to
implement this section.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 29 — Maternal Health
*MBM132*
02/06/2025 12:23:03 PM MBM132

HB1427

20-77-2901. Depression screening for pregnant women.
(a) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall reimburse for depression
screening of a pregnant woman.
(b) The Department of Human Services shall apply for any federal
waiver, Medicaid state plan amendments, or other authority necessary to
implement this section.

20-77-2902. Coverage of prenatal, delivery, and postpartum services.
(a) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall reimburse for prenatal,
delivery, and postpartum services separately in lieu of a global payment or
an all-inclusive payment methodology for maternity services.
(b) Prenatal, delivery, and postpartum services include without
limitation:
(1) Office visits;
(2) Laboratory fees;
(3) Physician ordered testing;
(4) Blood work;
(5) Remote monitoring;
(6) Fetal nonstress tests; and
(7) Continuous glucose monitors or other services for
gestational diabetes when medically necessary.
(c) This section does not alter coverage provided through the Arkansas
Health and Opportunity for Me Program or a risk-based provider organization
under the Medicaid Provider-Led Organized Care Act, § 20-77-2701 et seq.

20-77-2903. Presumptive eligibility for pregnant women.
(a) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall make presumptive eligibility
determinations for pregnant women who are applying for the program to improve
access to prenatal care and allow prenatal care to be delivered immediately
while waiting for a full application to be processed.
(b) The program may designate one (1) or more qualified entities to
screen for eligibility and immediately enroll pregnant women into the
program.

20-77-2904. Blood pressure monitoring for pregnant and postpartum
02/06/2025 12:23:03 PM MBM132

HB1427
women.
(a) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall provide coverage and
reimbursement for self-measurement blood pressure monitoring services for
pregnant women and postpartum women.
(b) Self-measurement blood pressure monitoring services shall include:
(1) Validated blood pressure monitoring devices, such as a blood
pressure cuff and replacement cuffs, as medically necessary, to diagnose or
treat hypertension;
(2) Patient education and training on the set-up and use of a
self-measurement blood pressure measurement device that is validated for
clinical accuracy, device calibration, and the procedure for obtaining self-
measurement readings; and
(3) Collection of data reports by the patient or caregiver for
submission to a healthcare provider to communicate blood pressure readings
and create or modify treatment plans.

20-77-2905. Reimbursement for remote ultrasound procedures.
(a)(1) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall reimburse for medically
necessary remote ultrasound procedures utilizing established Current
Procedural Terminology codes for remote ultrasound procedures when the
patient is in a residence or other off-site location from the healthcare
provider of the patient and the same standard of care is met.
(2) Subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall apply to the fee-
for-service categories of the program and any managed care plan within the
program.
(b) A remote ultrasound procedure shall be reimbursable when the
healthcare provider uses digital technology that:
(1) Collects medical and other forms of health data from a
patient and electronically transmits the information securely to a healthcare
provider in a different location for interpretation and recommendation;
(2) Is compliant with the Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996, 42 U.S.C. § 1320d et seq., as it existed on
January 1, 2025; and
(3) Is approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration.

02/06/2025 12:23:03 PM MBM132

HB1427
20-77-2906. Coverage for certain services provided by doulas and
community health workers.
The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall reimburse doulas and community
health workers for home visitation related to prenatal care and postpartum
care.

20-77-2907. Implementation and rules.
The Department of Human Services shall:
(1) Apply for any federal waiver, Medicaid state plan
amendments, or other authority necessary to implement this subchapter; and
(2) Adopt rules to implement this subchapter.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 16-114-203(c), concerning the statute of
limitations, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) If Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if an
individual is nine (9) years of age or younger at the time of the act,
omission, or failure complained of, the minor or person claiming on behalf of
the minor shall have until the later of the minor's eleventh birthday or two
(2) years from the act, omission, or failure in which to commence an action.
(2) However, if If no medical injury is known and could not
reasonably have been discovered prior to the minor's eleventh birthday, then
the minor or his or her representative shall have until two (2) years after
the medical injury is known or reasonably could have been discovered, or
until the minor's nineteenth birthday, whichever is earlier, in which to
commence an action.
(3) If an alleged medical injury occurred during childbirth, the
minor or his or her representative shall have until the minor's fifth
birthday to commence an action.








02/06/2025 12:23:03 PM MBM132